test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_A_nika_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: inikaishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: inikaishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: inikaishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: inikaishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: inikaishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: inikaishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: inikaishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: inikaishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nikaenhimishinaaniban
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nikaenhimishiniiban
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nikaenhimishini***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nikaenhimishiwaaiban
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nikaensimishinaaniban
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nikaensimishiniiban
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nikaensimishini***idig, idog***
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nikaensimishiwaaiban
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nikaenhimishinaaning
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nikaenhimishinaanan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nikaenhimishinaanag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nikaenhimishiniing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nikaenhimishinian
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nikaenhimishiniag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nikaenhimishiwaaing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nikaenhimishiwaaan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nikaenhimishiwaaag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nikaensimishinaaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nikaensimishinaanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nikaensimishinaanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nikaensimishiniing
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nikaensimishinian
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nikaensimishiniag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nikaensimishiwaaing
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nikaensimishiwaaan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nikaensimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nikaenhimishibaning
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nikaenhimishibanan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nikaenhimishibanag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhimish***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nikaensimishibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nikaensimishibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nikaensimishibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nikaensimish***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nikaensimish***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nikaensimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikaenhiminaanibaning
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikaenhiminaanibanan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikaenhiminaanibanag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikaenhiminiibaning
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikaenhiminiibanan
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikaenhiminiibanag
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhimini***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikaenhimiwaaibaning
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikaenhimiwaaibanan
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikaenhimiwaaibanag
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikaensiminaanibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikaensiminaanibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikaensiminaanibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikaensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikaensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikaensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikaensiminiibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikaensiminiibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikaensiminiibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikaensimini***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikaensimini***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikaensimini***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikaensimiwaaibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikaensimiwaaibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikaensimiwaaibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikaensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikaensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikaensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikaenhishinaanibaning
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikaenhishinaanibanan
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikaenhishinaanibanag
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikaenhishiniibaning
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikaenhishiniibanan
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikaenhishiniibanag
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhishini***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikaenhishiwaaibaning
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikaenhishiwaaibanan
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikaenhishiwaaibanag
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikaensishinaanibaning
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikaensishinaanibanan
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikaensishinaanibanag
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikaensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikaensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikaensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikaensishiniibaning
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikaensishiniibanan
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikaensishiniibanag
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikaensishini***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikaensishini***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikaensishini***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikaensishiwaaibaning
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikaensishiwaaibanan
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikaensishiwaaibanag
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikaensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikaensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikaensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikaimishinaanibaning
     nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikaimishinaanibanan
     nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikaimishinaanibanag
     nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikaimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikaimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikaimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikaimishiniibaning
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikaimishiniibanan
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikaimishiniibanag
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikaimishini***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikaimishini***idig, idog***an
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikaimishini***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikaimishiwaaibaning
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikaimishiwaaibanan
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikaimishiwaaibanag
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikaimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikaimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikaimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ninikaenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ninikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ninikaenhimishiniiban
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ninikaenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ninikaenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ninikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ninikaensimishinaaniban
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ninikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ninikaensimishiniiban
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ninikaensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ninikaensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ninikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ginikaenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ginikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ginikaenhimishiniiban
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ginikaenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ginikaenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ginikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ginikaensimishinaaniban
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ginikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ginikaensimishiniiban
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ginikaensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ginikaensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ginikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: onikaenhimishinaaniban
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: onikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: onikaenhimishiniiban
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: onikaenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: onikaenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: onikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: onikaensimishinaaniban
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: onikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: onikaensimishiniiban
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: onikaensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: onikaensimishiwaaiban
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: onikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: inikaenhimishinaaniban
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: inikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: inikaenhimishiniiban
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: inikaenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: inikaenhimishiwaaiban
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: inikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: inikaensimishinaaniban
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: inikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: inikaensimishiniiban
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: inikaensimishini***idig, idog***
